Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0088.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 903b. (1) A retailer violates this act if the retailer or the retailer's clerk, servant, agent, or employee makes a payment to a wholesaler , the commission, or this state by any means that has been dishonored by a financial institution for lack of sufficient funds.any reason. (2) A wholesaler shall require a retailer that has made a payment to the wholesaler that has been dishonored by a financial institution to pay the wholesaler an administrative fee as follows: (a) For the first dishonored payment, $50.00. (b) For a second dishonored payment within 12 months of the first dishonored payment, $100.00. (c) For a third dishonored payment within 12 months of the first dishonored payment, $150.00. (d) For a fourth dishonored payment within 12 months of the first dishonored payment, $200.00. (e) For a fifth or any subsequent dishonored payment within 12 months of the first dishonored payment, $250.00.